ja: ハンマーヘッド材質: アルミニウム; 真鍮; ブロンズ; カーボン鋼; コッパー; ガラス繊維; グラファイト; 鉄; ナイロン; プラスチック; ポリウレタン (PU); ゴム; ステンレススチール; スチール; 木材; その他
en: Hammer head material: Aluminum; Brass; Bronze; Carbon steel; Copper; Fiberglass; Graphite; Iron; Nylon; Plastic; Polyurethane (PU); Rubber; Stainless steel; Steel; Wood; Other
tr: Çekiç kafası malzemesi: Alüminyum; Pirinç; Bronz; Karbon çelik; Bakır; Fiberglas; Grafit; Demir; Plastik; Plastik; Poliüretan (PU); Kauçuk; Paslanmaz çelik; Çelik; Ahşap; Diğer
zh-TW: 鎚頭材質: 鋁; 黃銅; 銅色; 碳素鋼; 紅銅色; 玻璃纖維; 石墨; 鐵; 尼龍; 塑膠; 聚氨酯 (PU); 橡膠; 不銹鋼; 鋼; 木材; 其他
sk-SK: Materiál hlavy kladiva: Hliník; Mosadz; Bronzový; Uhlíková oceľ; Meď; Sklolaminát; Grafit; Železo; Nylon; Plast; Polyuretán (PU); Guma; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Oceľ; Drevo; Iné
nb: Hammerhodemateriale: Aluminium; Messing; Bronse; Karbonstål; Kobber; Glassfiber; Grafitt; Jern; Nylon; Plast; Polyuretan (PU); Gummi; Rustfritt stål; Stål; Trevirke; Annet
zh-CN: 锤头材质: 铝; 黄铜; 青铜色; 碳钢; 铜色; 玻璃纤维; 石墨; 铁; 尼龙; 塑料; 聚氨酯 (PU); 橡胶; 不锈钢; 钢; 木头; 其他
ro-RO: Material cap ciocan: Aluminiu; Alamă; Bronz; Oțel carbon; Cupru; Fibră de sticlă; Grafit; Iron; Nailon; Plastic; Poliuretan (PU); Cauciuc; Oțel inoxidabil; Oțel; Lemn; Altele
lt-LT: Plaktuko galvutės medžiaga: Aliuminis; Žalvaris; Bronza; Anglinis plienas; Varis; Stiklo pluoštas; Grafitas; „Iron“ (tiesių smūgių); Nailonas; Plastikas; Poliuretanas (PU); Kaučiukas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Plienas; Mediena; Kita
sl-SI: Material glave kladiva: Aluminij; Medenina; Bron; Ogljikovo jeklo; Baker; Steklena vlakna; Grafit; Železo; Najlon; Plastika; Poliuretan (PU); Guma; Nerjavno jeklo; Jeklo; Les; Drugo
hr-HR: Materijal glave čekića: Aluminij; Mjed; Bronca; Ugljični čelik; Bakar; Stakloplastika; Grafit; Željezo; Najlon; Plastika; Poliuretan (PU); Guma; Nehrđajući čelik; Čelik; Drvo; Ostalo
pt-BR: Material da cabeça do martelo: Alumínio; Latão; Bronze; Aço carbono; Cobre; Fibra de vidro; Grafite; Ferro; Nylon; Plástico; Poliuretano (PU); Borracha; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Madeira; Outro
vi: Vật liệu đầu búa: Nhôm; Đồng; Màu đồng; Thép carbon; Màu đồng đỏ; Sợi thủy tinh; Than chì; Sắt; Nylon; Nhựa; Polyurethane (PU); Cao su; Thép không gỉ; Thép; Gỗ; Khác
cs: Materiál hlavy kladiva: Hliník; Mosaz; Bronzová; Uhlíková ocel; Měděná; Skelná vata; Grafit; Železo; Nylon; Plast; Polyuretan (PU); Guma; Nerezová ocel; Ocel; Dřevo; Jiné
bg-BG: Материал на главата на чука: Алуминий; Месинг; Бронз; Въглеродна стомана; Мед; Fiberglass; Графит; Желязо; Найлон; Пластмаса; Полиуретан (PU); Каучук; Неръждаема стомана; Стомана; Дърво; Други
nl: Materiaal hamerkop: Aluminium; Messing; Brons; Koolstofstaal; Koper; Glasvezel; Grafiet; IJzer; Nylon; Plastic; Polyurethaan (PU); Rubber; Roestvrij staal; Staal; Hout; Andere
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำส่วนหัวค้อน: อะลูมิเนียม; ทองเหลือง; สีบรอนซ์; เหล็กคาร์บอน; สีทองแดง; ไฟเบอร์กลาส; แกรไฟท์; เหล็ก; ไนลอน; พลาสติก; โพลิยูรีเทน (PU); ยาง; เหล็กสเตนเลส; เหล็ก; ไม้; อื่นๆ
it: Materiale della testa del martello: Alluminio; Ottone; Bronzo; Acciaio al carbonio; Rame; Vetroresina; Grafite; Ferro; Nylon; Plastica; Poliuretano (PU); Gomma; Acciaio inossidabile; Acciaio; Legno; Altro
da: Hammerhovedmateriale: Aluminum; Messing; Bronze; Kulstofstål; Kobber; Glasfiber; Grafit; Jern; Nylon; Plast; Polyurethan (PU); Gummi; Rustfrit stål; Stål; Træ; Andet
pl: Materiał obucha do młotków: Aluminium; Mosiądz; Brąz; Stal węglowa; Miedź; Włókno szklane; Grafit; Żelazo; Nylon; Tworzywo sztuczne; Poliuretan (PU); Guma; Stal nierdzewna; Stal; Drewno; Inne
ru: Материал бойка молотка: Алюминий; Латунь; Бронза; Углеродистая сталь; Медь; Стекловолокно; Графит; Железо; Нейлон; Пластик; Полиуретан (ПУ); Резина; Нержавеющая сталь; Сталь; Дерево; Другое
fr: Matériau de la tête du marteau: Aluminum; Laiton; Bronze; Woks en acier au carbone; Cuivre; Fibre de verre; Graphite; Fer; Nylon; Plastique; Polyuréthane (PU); Caoutchouc; Acier inoxydable; Acier; Bois; Autre
hu: Kalapácsfej anyaga: Alumínium; Sárgaréz; Bronz; Szénacél; Réz; Üveggyapot; Grafit; Vas; Nejlon; Műanyag; Poliuretán (PU); Gumi; Rozsdamentes acél; Acél; Fa; Egyéb
es: Material del cabezal del martillo: Aluminio; Latón; Bronce; Acero al carbono; Cobre; Fibra de vidrio; Grafito; Hierro; Nylon; Plástico; Poliuretano (PU); Goma; Acero inoxidable; Acero; Madera; Otros
fi: Vasaran pään materiaali: Alumiini; Messinki; Pronssi; Hiiliteräs; Kupari; Lasikuitu; Grafiitti; Rauta; Nailon; Muovi; Polyuretaani (PU); Kumi; Ruostumaton teräs; Teräs; Puu; Muu
sv: Hammarhuvud - material: Aluminium; Mässing; Brons; Kolstål; Koppar; Glasfiber; Grafit; Järn; Nylon; Plast; Polyuretan (PU); Gummi; Rostfritt stål; Stål; Trä; Övrigt
de: Hammerkopfmaterial: Aluminium; Messing; Bronze; Kohlenstoffstahl; Kupfer; Fiberglas; Graphit; Eisen; Nylon; Kunststoff; Polyurethan (PU); Gummi; Edelstahl; Stahl; Holz; Sonstiges
ko: 해머 헤드 소재: 알루미늄; 황동; 청동색; 탄소강; 구리; 유리 섬유; 흑연; 철; 나일론; 플라스틱; 폴리우레탄(PU); 고무; 스테인리스 스틸; 강철; 목재; 기타
pt-PT: Material da cabeça do martelo: Alumínio; Latão; Bronze; Aço carbono; Cobre; Fibra de vidro; Grafite; Ferro; Náilon; Plástico; Poliuretano (PU); Borracha; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Madeira; Outro
el: Υλικό κεφαλής σφυριού: Αλουμίνιο; Ορείχαλκος; Ορείχαλκος; Ανθρακούχος χάλυβας; Χαλκός; Υαλοβάμβακας; Γραφίτης; Σίδερο; Νάιλον; Πλαστικό; Πολυουρεθάνη (PU); Καουτσούκ; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Χάλυβας; Ξύλο; Άλλο